Utah statutes.
4-26-102.   Adjoining landowners -- Partition fences -- Contribution.

(1)  If two or more persons agree to a fence enclosure or to the construction of a partition fence, the cost of construction and maintenance of the fence shall be apportioned between each party to the agreement based upon the amount of land enclosed.

(2)  A person who is a party to an agreement described in Subsection (1) and who fails to maintain such person's part of the fence is liable in a civil action for any damage sustained by another party to the agreement as a result of the failure to maintain the fence.

(3)  If a person has enclosed land with a fence and the owner of adjoining land desires to enclose land adjoining the fence so that the existing fence or any part of it will become a partition fence between such tracts of land, the owner of the adjoining land shall, before making the enclosure, pay to the owner of the existing fence one-half of the value of all that part of the fence that will become a partition fence; and when one party ceases to improve or cultivate his land or opens his enclosure he may not take away any part of the partition fence belonging to him, if the owner or occupant of the adjoining enclosure within 30 days after notice, pays for the value of such fence; nor shall the partition fence be removed if the crops enclosed by it will be exposed to injury.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 331, 2012 General Session

